Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1809
Rules and regulations.

The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
to carry out the ICF/DD Reimbursement Protection
Act.

Laws 2004, LB 841, § 10;

Laws 2013, LB23, § 25.